Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.050

Special inquiry judge—Selection.

In every county a superior court judge as designated by a majority of the judges shall be available to serve as a special inquiry judge to hear evidence concerning criminal activity and corruption.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 5.]